Nebraska, session 109, LB479.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB479 LB479
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-27,132 (1) There is hereby created a fund to be designated the
Revenue Distribution Fund which shall be set apart and maintained by the
Tax Commissioner. Revenue not required to be credited to the General Fund
or any other specified fund may be credited to the Revenue Distribution
Fund. Credits and refunds of such revenue shall be paid from the Revenue
Distribution Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and
refunds, shall be allocated as provided by the statutes creating such
revenue.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall pay to a depository bank designated
by the State Treasurer all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner shall present to the State Treasurer
bank receipts showing amounts so deposited in the bank, and of the
amounts so deposited the State Treasurer shall:
(a)(i) For transactions occurring on or after October 1, 2014, and
before July 1, 2024, credit to the Game and Parks Commission Capital
Maintenance Fund all of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed
pursuant to section 77-2703 on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined
in section 37-1204, personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01,
all-terrain vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type
vehicles as defined in section 60-135.01; and
(ii) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2024, credit to
the Game and Parks Commission Capital Maintenance Fund all of the
proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section 77-2703
on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined in section 37-1204,
personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01, all-terrain
vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type vehicles as
defined in section 60-135.01, and from such proceeds, transfers shall be
made to the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund as provided
in section 37-327.02;
-2-

LB479 LB479
2025 2025
(b) Credit to the Highway Trust Fund all of the proceeds of the
sales and use taxes derived from the sale or lease for periods of more
than thirty-one days of motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers,
except that the proceeds equal to any sales tax rate provided for in
section 77-2701.02 that is in excess of five percent derived from the
sale or lease for periods of more than thirty-one days of motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers shall be credited to the Highway Allocation
Fund;
(c) For transactions occurring on or after October 1, 2025 July 1,
2013, and before July 1, 2042, of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes
derived from transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a),
(b), and (e) of this section from a sales tax rate of one-half one-
quarter of one percent, credit monthly eighty-five percent to the Highway
Trust Fund and fifteen percent to the Highway Allocation Fund;
(d) Of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (e)
of this section, credit to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund the amount
certified under section 77-27,237, if any such certification is made; and
(e) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2023, credit to
the Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital Improvement Fund all
of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section
77-2703 on the sale or lease of aircraft as defined in section 3-101.
The balance of all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-